Massachusetts, session 194th, H1060.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 150A of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the seventeenth paragraph, the following
paragraph:-
The department shall adopt regulations related to violations of the terms of a permit by
facilities within environmental justice communities. The regulations shall include, but not be
limited to, substantial monetary fines that increase with each violation of the terms of a permit by
facilities within environmental justice communities and permit revocation for facilities within
environmental justice communities that violate the terms of such permit regularly.
of 1